Wisconsin, session 2025, SB958.
do enact as follows:SB958,11Section 1. 13.59 of the statutes is created to read:SB958,2,8213.59 Joint committee for the oversight of the water fund for our 3future. (1) Creation. There is created a joint standing committee for the 4oversight of the water fund for our future composed of 3 majority party and 2 5minority party senators and 3 majority party and 2 minority party representatives 6to the assembly, appointed as are the members of standing committees in their 7respective houses; the secretary of health services or his or her designee; and the 8secretary of natural resources or his or her designee.SB958,2,109(2) Officers. In making appointments of the members of each house, each 10house shall designate a cochairperson.SB958,2,1211(3) Staff. The committee shall be staffed as are other standing committees 12of the legislature.SB958,3,21(4) Meetings. The committee shall meet as often as necessary to perform its 2duties and functions.SB958,3,33(5) Powers and duties. (a) The committee shall do all of the following:SB958,3,641. Receive applications for making expenditures from the water fund for our 5future and make recommendations to the joint committee on finance regarding use 6of the water fund for our future.SB958,3,872. Recommend to the joint committee on finance an amount to transfer from 8the water fund for our future to the rapid response account under s. 25.44 (3).SB958,3,119(b) The committee may not recommend, and the joint committee on finance 10may not approve, expenditures from the water fund for our future for purposes 11other than to fund activities relating to clean water.SB958,212Section 2. 20.370 (4) (az) of the statutes is created to read:SB958,3,151320.370 (4) (az) Rapid response actions. From the rapid response account of 14the water fund for our future, a sum sufficient for rapid response actions in 15response to natural disasters and public health emergencies under s. 299.87.SB958,316Section 3. 20.435 (1) (s) of the statutes is created to read:SB958,3,191720.435 (1) (s) Rapid response actions. From the rapid response account of the 18water fund for our future, a sum sufficient for rapid response actions in response to 19natural disasters and public health emergencies under s. 299.87.SB958,420Section 4. 25.17 (1) (ymk) of the statutes is created to read:SB958,3,212125.17 (1) (ymk) Water fund for our future (s. 25.44);SB958,522Section 5. 25.44 of the statutes is created to read:SB958,4,52325.44 Water fund for our future. (1) There is established a separate 1nonlapsible trust fund designated as the water fund for our future, to consist of all 2moneys transferred under 2025 Wisconsin Act .... (this act), section 9 (1), and all 3moneys collected by the department of natural resources or the department of 4justice under settlement agreements or orders in settlement of actions or proposed 5actions as reimbursement for expenditures from this fund.SB958,4,96(2) The joint committee on finance may at any time transfer any amount of 7the unencumbered balance from the water fund for our future to the budget 8stabilization fund if the moneys in the budget stabilization fund have been fully 9expended.SB958,4,1610(3) There is established in the water fund for our future a rapid response 11account consisting of all moneys transferred to the account by the joint committee 12on finance, which may at any time transfer any amount of the unencumbered 13balance from the water fund for our future to the rapid response account. Moneys 14in the rapid response account shall be reserved for discretionary use by the 15department of natural resources and the department of health services under s. 16299.87.SB958,617Section 6. 25.60 of the statutes is amended to read:SB958,5,21825.60 Budget stabilization fund. There is created a separate nonlapsible 19trust fund designated as the budget stabilization fund, consisting of moneys 20transferred to the fund from the general fund under ss. 16.518 (3) and 16.72 (4) (b) 21and any moneys transferred to the fund from the water fund for our future under s. 2225.44. Moneys in the budget stabilization fund are reserved to provide state 1revenue stability during periods of below-normal economic activity when actual 2state revenues are lower than estimated revenues under s. 20.005 (1).SB958,73Section 7. 299.87 of the statutes is created to read:SB958,5,124299.87 Rapid response; supplemental funding requests from the 5water fund for our future. (1) The department and the department of health 6services may use moneys from the rapid response account of the water fund for our 7future under s. 25.44 to respond to natural disasters and public health emergencies. 8Funds from the rapid response account may be used for the costs of remediation and 9to notify, relocate, and assist individuals affected by the natural disaster or public 10health emergency. The department and the department of health services may 11promulgate rules as necessary to establish procedures and policies for the use of 12moneys from the rapid response account.SB958,6,213(2) Any department or agency of the state may submit to the joint committee 14on finance for consideration under s. 13.10 a request for funding from the water 15fund for our future. The joint committee on finance shall notify the joint committee 16for the oversight of the water fund for our future of the request. After receiving 17notification of a request, and at least 14 working days before the next regularly 18scheduled meeting of the joint committee on finance under s. 13.10, the joint 19committee for the oversight of the water fund for our future shall submit to the joint 20committee on finance a written recommendation regarding the request. The joint 21committee on finance may provide the requested supplement only if the joint 22committee for the oversight of the water fund for our future recommends approving 23the request. If a member of the committee objects to a request for funding under 1this subsection, the name of each objecting member, as well as the reason for each 2objection, shall be recorded and made publicly available.SB958,83Section 8. 299.97 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB958,6,124299.97 (2) In addition to the penalties provided under sub. (1), the court may 5award the department of justice the reasonable and necessary expenses of the 6investigation and prosecution of the violation, including attorney fees. The 7department of justice shall deposit in the state treasury for deposit into the general 8fund all moneys that the court awards to the department or the state under this 9subsection, except that any moneys awarded as reimbursement for expenditures 10from the water fund for our future shall be deposited into that fund. The costs of 11investigation and the expenses of prosecution, including attorney fees, shall be 12credited to the appropriation account under s. 20.455 (1) (gh).SB958,913Section 9. Fiscal changes.SB958,6,1614(1) General fund transfer to water fund for our future. There is 15transferred from the general fund to the water fund for our future $250,000,000 in 16fiscal year 2025-26.SB958,6,1717